Illinois, session 104th, SB682.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 14-126 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/14-126)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 14-126)7    Sec. 14-126. Nonoccupational disability benefit-Rights on 8expiration-Retirement annuity option on re-entry. Any member 9having 15 or more years of creditable service, and and having 10attained at least age 55, or having 20 or more years of 11creditable service and having attained at least age 50, who, 12after receiving nonoccupational disability benefit for the 13maximum period of time specified herein is still disabled for 14service, shall be entitled to receive a retirement annuity 15beginning the first of the month following application, 16without regard to whether the member has attained age 60.17    If a member having 15 but less than 20 years of creditable 18service is under age 55 when nonoccupational disability 19benefits terminate, and the member has been continuously 20disabled for service, the member is entitled upon application 21to the retirement annuity upon the first of the month after 22attainment of age 55.23    If a member having 20 or more years of creditable service   SB0682- 2 -LRB104 06989 RPS 17026 b1is under age 50 when nonoccupational disability benefits 2terminate, and the member has been continuously disabled for 3service, the member is entitled upon application to the 4retirement annuity beginning upon the first of the month after 5attainment of age 50.6    As an option to the computation of a retirement annuity in 7the manner provided in this Article, if a person who retires on 8a retirement annuity prior to age 60 under the provisions of 9this Section re-enters State employment, that person may 10refund to the system the amount theretofore received as a 11retirement annuity and upon subsequently retiring from State 12service shall be entitled to a retirement annuity computed as 13though that member had not previously received such annuity.14(Source: P.A. 80-841.)